Massachusetts, session 194th, H3253.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following definition:
“Disabled person”, a person who is unable to engage in substantial gainful activity by
reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment regardless of his or her age,
education, and work experience, cannot engage in substantial gainful activity. MGL s. 12A c.
71B
SECTION 2. Said Chapter 59 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by striking out
clause fiftieth and inserting in place thereof the following clause:-
Fiftieth, the increased value of residential real property as a result of alterations or
improvements thereto, not to exceed $500 of taxes due; provided, however, that said alterations
of 2

or improvements are made to provide housing for a person who is not the owner of the premises
and who is at least 60 years old or is disabled; provided further, that any such alterations or
improvements must be made to a house, consisting of no more than 3 units prior to such
alterations or improvements and which is owned and occupied by the applicant as his domicile;
and provided, further, that the applicant shall annually furnish to the assessors a statement under
oath that the alterations or improvements were made to provide housing for a person who is at
least 60 years old or who is disabled. This exemption shall terminate when the premises are no
longer occupied by any such elderly or disabled person. No person shall receive more than 1
exemption under the provisions of this clause in any fiscal year. This clause shall take effect
upon its acceptance by any city or town and shall apply only to alterations or improvements
made on or after the date of such acceptance by such city or town.
of 2